Alaska statutes. Title 47. Welfare, Social Services, and Institutions.
Chapter 15. Uniform Interstate Compact on Juveniles.
Section 58, ch. 107, SLA 1998 provides: “SCOPE AND APPLICABILITY OF SECTION 46. The juvenile rendition amendment to the Interstate Compact on Juveniles is hereby enacted into law by sec. 46 of this Act and entered into by this state with all other states legally joining therein in the form substantially as set out in sec. 46 of this Act. Section 46 of this Act applies to offenses committed before, on, or after July 1, 1998.”